Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.530

First responder peer support services programs—Grants.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the commission shall establish and administer a grant program to provide funding to first responder entities and agencies for the implementation or expansion of peer support services programs.

(2) Any first responder entity or agency that receives funding through the grant program must:

(a) Ensure that every peer supporter designated by the entity or agency enrolls in and completes the 40-hour training program established under RCW 43.101.515 after it is made available;

(b) Compensate every peer supporter designated by the entity or agency for their services in that role; and

(c) Provide information to every peer supporter designated by the entity or agency about the first responder peer support network established under RCW 43.101.525(1)(a).

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "First responder" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 5.60.060; and

(b) "Peer supporter" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 5.60.060.

[ 2024 c 295 s 5.]